California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
11405.

“Registrant” means any person that registers pursuant to Section 11732 or 12031.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1050.)
-------------------------------------------

11407.

“Pest control dealer” means any person, including any manufacturer, distributor, or retailer who engages in any of the following business activities:

(a) Selling pesticides to users for an agricultural use.

(b) Selling to users any method or device for the control of agricultural pests, such as biological agents, lures, or insect-trapping devices.

(c) Soliciting sales of pesticides by making agricultural use recommendations through field representatives, or other agents.

(d) Selling to a user a pesticide classified pursuant to Section 14004.5 as a restricted material that requires either a permit for possession and use or which may be used only by or under the direct supervision of a certified applicator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11407.5.

“Pest control dealer” does not include either of the following:

(a) Any person licensed pursuant to Section 11701 to engage for hire in the business of agricultural pest control, as to pesticides recommended or sold by the licensee and applied by the licensee pursuant to the conditions of the license.

(b) Any person licensed to engage in any activity that is defined as structural pest control pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 8500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, as to pesticides recommended or sold by the licensee and applied by the licensee pursuant to the conditions of the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 620, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11408.

“Agricultural use” means the use of any pesticide or method or device for the control of plant or animal pests, or any other pests, or the use of any pesticide for the regulation of plant growth or defoliation of plants. It excludes the sale or use of pesticides in properly labeled packages or containers that are intended for any of the following:

(a) Home use.

(b) Use in structural pest control.

(c) Industrial or institutional use.

(d) The control of an animal pest under the written prescription of a veterinarian.

(e) Local districts or other public agencies that have entered into and operate under a cooperative agreement with the State Department of Health Services pursuant to Section 116180 of the Health and Safety Code, provided that any exemption under this subdivision is subject to the approval of the director as being required to carry out the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 50.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

11410.

“Agricultural pest control adviser” means any person who offers a recommendation on any agricultural use, who holds himself or herself forth as an authority on any agricultural use, or who solicits services or sales for any agricultural use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1118, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11411.

“Recommendation” means the giving of any instruction or advice on any agricultural use as to any particular application on any particular piece of property. “Recommendation” does not include any summary that does not specify the use to be made for any designated pest, provided that such summary is not in conflict with any registered pesticide label or with the supplementary printed direction delivered therewith or with any rule or regulation of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1050.)
-------------------------------------------

11412.

“Sustainable pest management” means a holistic, whole system approach applicable to agricultural and other managed ecosystems and urban and rural communities that builds on the concept of integrated pest management to include the wider context of the three sustainability pillars: human health and social equity; environmental protection; and, economic vitality.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 3.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11454.2.

(a) The Department of Pesticide Regulation shall consult with the Department of Food and Agriculture in any action relating to special local need registrations pursuant to Section 136v of Title 7 of the United States Code, emergency exemptions from registration pursuant to Section 136p of Title 7 of the United States Code, denial of new active ingredient registrations, suspension or cancellation of pesticide registrations or uses, or other measures adopted to mitigate unacceptable adverse pesticidal effects.

(b) Consultation pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be as specified in a memorandum of understanding between the Department of Food and Agriculture and the Department of Pesticide Regulation. Information to be provided by the Department of Food and Agriculture shall include, but not be limited to, (1) impacts on agriculture resulting from the proposed action, (2) benefits derived from the use of the pesticide, and (3) any recommended alternative action.

(c) Except for a suspension taken pursuant to Section 12826, the Department of Pesticide Regulation shall request in writing comments from the Department of Food and Agriculture regarding any proposed final decision to deny a new active ingredient registration or to suspend or cancel a pesticide registration. The Department of Pesticide Regulation shall specify in its request the period within which the Department of Food and Agriculture shall submit its comments in order for the Department of Pesticide Regulation to consider and to respond to them in the final written decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 706, Sec. 8.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

11456.

The director may do all of the following:

(a) Adopt regulations that are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this code that the director is required or authorized to administer or enforce.

(b) Enter upon any premises to inspect the premises or any plant, appliance, or thing that is on those premises.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided in subdivision (d), provide, by rule or regulation, for the issuance and renewal on a two-year basis of licenses, certificates of registration, or other indicia of authority issued pursuant
 to the provisions of this code that the director is required or authorized to administer or enforce.

(d) Adopt regulations for the issuance and renewal of licenses and certificates for pest control operations. On or after January 1, 2025, the director shall issue and renew these licenses and certificates for three years; provided, however, a license or certificate may be issued for less than three years based on when the applicant enters the three-year cycle.

(e) Arrange for the services of any individual employed by the United States, the state, or a county on a collaborative basis and allow that person a reasonable fee and necessary expenses that are incurred when serving the department in a collaborative capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 60, Sec. 4.   (AB 203)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11472.

The director shall keep a separate record of the classes and sources of income that is credited to, and disbursed from, the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11472.1.

On or before October 31 of each year, the department shall publish a financial report regarding the preceding fiscal year and shall make this report available to the public. The report shall describe in detail the amount and source of funding for the major programmatic functions of the department and other relevant information that may aid in evaluating the scope and impact of the activities of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 77, Sec. 1.   Effective July 18, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Refunds [11480. - 11485.]

11480.

“Fee,” as used in this article, includes, but is not limited to, any application fee, license fee, permit fee, inspection fee, certification fee, registration fee, identification fee, analysis fee, certificate fee, or delinquent fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11481.

(a) The director may authorize the refund of any money that is received or collected by the department in the payment of any fee, assessment, or tax, except that the director shall not authorize a refund of any money received by the department pursuant to a settlement agreement, stipulated judgment, or similar document or if the refund request is submitted more than four years after the payment was made.

(b) An amount equal to the amount of the refund is, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years, from the funds into which the fees were deposited, to the director to make the refunds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11482.

A refund may be made in whole or in part in any of the following instances:

(a) A refund of a fee is requested by the payer before any examination, review, inspection, or similar activity has been performed or services rendered by the department for the payer.

(b) The payment of a fee, assessment, or tax represents an overpayment, payment in duplicate, payment in error in law, or payment through error of the payer or the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11483.

The fiscal officer of the department shall make payment of any refund pursuant to this article upon the submission to the fiscal officer of a voucher prepared by the director, or his or her designee, that sets forth the facts that pertain to the refund and authorizes its payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11484.

If any money that is to be refunded has been deposited in the State Treasury, the Controller, upon receipt of a claim that is filed by the department, shall transfer that amount from the fund to which the money is credited to the director for payment of the refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11485.

If the director finds that the amount of any refund is less than fifty dollars ($50), the director may retain the amount for use for the same purpose for which the original payment was made, unless the payment was made in error in law, in which case the director shall refund the amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [11501. - 11520.]

11501.

The purposes of this division and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12501), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12751), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14001), and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 14101) of Division 7 are as follows:

(a) To provide for the proper, safe, and efficient use of pesticides essential for production of food and fiber and for protection of the public health and safety.

(b) To protect the environment from environmentally harmful pesticides by prohibiting, regulating, or ensuring proper stewardship of those pesticides.

(c) To assure the agricultural and pest control workers of safe working conditions where pesticides are present.

(d) To permit agricultural pest control by competent and responsible licensees and permittees under strict control of the director and commissioners.

(e) To assure consumers and users that pesticides are properly labeled and are appropriate for the use designated by the label and that state or local governmental dissemination of information on pesticidal uses of any registered pesticide product is consistent with the uses for which the product is registered.

(f) To encourage the development and implementation of pest management systems, stressing application of biological and cultural pest control techniques with selective pesticides when necessary to achieve acceptable levels of control with the least possible harm to nontarget organisms and the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11501.1.

(a) This division and Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501) are of statewide concern and occupy the whole field of regulation regarding the registration, sale, transportation, or use of pesticides to the exclusion of all local regulation. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this code, no ordinance or regulation of local government, including, but not limited to, an action by a local governmental agency or department, a county board of supervisors or a city council, or a local regulation adopted by the use of an initiative measure, may prohibit or in any way attempt to regulate any matter relating to the registration, sale, transportation, or use of pesticides, and any of these ordinances, laws, or regulations are void and of no force or effect.

(b) If the director determines that an ordinance or regulation, on its face or in its application, is preempted by subdivision (a), the director shall notify the promulgating entity that it is preempted by state law. If the entity does not repeal its ordinance or regulation, the director shall maintain an action for declaratory relief to have the ordinance or regulation declared void and of no force or effect, and shall also bring an action to enjoin enforcement of the ordinance or regulation.

(c) Neither this division nor Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501) is a limitation on the authority of a state agency or department to enforce or administer any law that the agency or department is authorized or required to enforce or administer.

(d) At the request of any state agency disseminating information on the pesticidal uses of any product, the director shall consult with, and provide technical assistance to, that agency to ensure that the dissemination is based on valid scientific information and consistent with state law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 361, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11501.5.

The director, and the commissioner of each county under the direction and supervision of the director, shall enforce this division and the regulations which are issued pursuant to it.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 11501 by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.

The director shall adopt regulations which govern the conduct of the business of pest control.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.5.

(a) The director may adopt regulations to establish the minimum requirements of education, continuing education, training, experience, and examination for applicants for any license or certificate, or renewal of any license or certificate, issued by the director pursuant to this division or Division 7 (commencing with Section 12500). A regulation adopted or amended pursuant to this section pertaining to continuing education requirements shall establish minimum course requirements related to pesticides and pest management. The director shall approve courses that include plant health, organic and sustainable practices, integrated pest management, water and air monitoring and residue mitigation, maximum residue levels, quarantine practices, and the on-farm storage of fumigants, all in the context of pesticides and pest
 management. The director shall not renew a license or certificate if the person who was issued the license or certificate did not complete the required continuing education during the period of validity of the license or certificate, and the person shall take and pass the examination to be again issued the license or certificate. The director shall act within 15 business days of receipt to approve or reject continuing education courses submitted to meet the requirements of this division or Division 7 (commencing with Section 12500).

(b) The director shall establish, by regulation, fees for the department’s licensing and certification programs as established pursuant to this division or Division 7 (commencing with Section 12500). These programs include, but are not limited to:

(1) License and certificate examination, application, and renewal.

(2) Approval of continuing education courses and continuing education course providers.

(3) Changes related to any license or certificate, including, but not limited to, name or address changes, license or certificate replacement costs, duplicate copy of a license or certificate, and changes in qualified person, bond, insurance, or registered officers.

(4) Penalties for late payment of licensing and certification fees.

(c) The fees established pursuant to this section may include administrative costs, including overhead costs.

(d) The regulations shall provide that the examination fee may be charged to applicants who request the secretary to reschedule an examination due to the applicant’s
 failure to obtain a passing score or failure to appear for the scheduled examination, and for scheduling an examination to amend a license.

(e) The fees established pursuant to this section shall be set so that the total revenue collected each fiscal year is sufficient to support the expenditure levels for these programs contained in the annual Budget Act. If the secretary determines that the revenue collected during the preceding year was greater than, or less than, the expenditure levels for these programs set forth in the Budget Act, the secretary may further adjust the current fees to compensate for the overcollection or undercollection.

(f) Funds collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Department of Pesticide Regulation Fund, and shall be available for expenditure by the department, upon appropriation, for
 purposes of carrying out the programs established pursuant to this division or Division 7 (commencing with Section 12500).

(g) The regulations adopted pursuant to this section, or any amendment thereto, shall be adopted by the secretary in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption of these regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as an emergency, and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other law, the emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until amended by the secretary.

(h) On or before January 31 of each year, if the director determines that they
 might increase the fees established pursuant to this section during that calendar year, the department shall post the determination on its internet website and shall distribute the determination through any of the department’s relevant email lists.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 60, Sec. 4.   (AB 2113)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.

The commissioner of any county may adopt regulations applicable in his or her county which are supplemental to those of the director which govern the conduct of pest control operations and records and reports of those operations. The regulations may include provisions pertaining to any matter related to the accomplishment of the purposes of Section 11737. The provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall be followed insofar as practicable in the adoption of the regulations by the commissioner. The regulations shall be filed with the director who shall compile them.

Each regulation of the commissioner shall be approved by the director before it becomes operative. The director, in his or her review of the commissioner’s regulations, shall consider, but not be limited to considering, the necessity, authority, clarity, and consistency of the regulations, as these terms are defined in Section 11349 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.5.

The county agricultural commissioner may apply Section 11503 to the agricultural use of any pesticide for agricultural production within one-quarter mile of a school with respect to the timing, notification, and method of application. Any regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall become operative unless specifically disapproved in writing by the director within 30 calendar days of their submission by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 457, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11504.

Prior to the adoption of regulations by a commissioner, a notice of intention to adopt regulations shall be published in the county, pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, at least 10 days in advance of the time the regulations are to be adopted, amended, or repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 105.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11505.

The notice of intention which is referred to in Section 11504 shall contain a statement of the time, place, and nature of proceedings for the adoption of the regulations, and either the express terms or an informative summary of the proposed regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11506.

At least 10 days prior to the date set for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulations, the commissioner shall mail a copy of the notice of intention to every person who has registered with the commissioner in the manner required by Article 2 (commencing with Section 11731), Chapter 4 of this division, and to any other interested person that has filed with the commissioner a request to receive a notice of such proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11507.

On the date and at the time and place designated in the notice of intention, the commissioner shall afford any interested person or his duly authorized representative, or both, the opportunity to present statements, arguments, or contentions in writing, with or without opportunity to present them orally.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11508.

The commissioner shall consider all relevant matter which is presented to him before he adopts any regulation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11509.

In any hearing which is conducted pursuant to Section 11507, the commissioner or his duly authorized representative shall have authority to administer oaths or affirmations, and may continue or postpone such hearing, from time to time, to such time and at such place as he shall determine.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11510.

The regulations of the commissioner are subject to review and approval by the director as to reasonableness, and if approved they shall be filed with the director. The regulations shall become effective 30 days after they are approved by the director unless they are designated as emergency regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11511.

If, in the opinion of the commissioner, the public health, welfare, or safety requires that any regulation take effect immediately he shall designate it as an emergency regulation and specify in writing the facts which constitute the necessity. An emergency regulation shall become effective on the date it is approved by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

11512.

Except as provided in Section 11512.5, the proceedings for all hearings conducted by the director pursuant to this division shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The director shall have all of the powers which are granted in that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 547, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11512.5.

(a) The commissioner may refuse, suspend, or revoke a county registration or permit pursuant to Section 11735, 11924, 12035, or 14008. Before that action is taken, the party whose registration or permit request is to be refused, suspended, or revoked, the registered party, or the permittee shall be given a written notice of the proposed action, including the basis for the action, and shall have the right to request a hearing before the commissioner within 20 days after receiving notice of the proposed action. A notice of the proposed action that is sent by certified mail to the last known address of the person against whom the action is proposed shall be considered received even if delivery is refused or the notice is not accepted at that address. If a hearing is requested, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given at least 10 days before the date set for the hearing. At the hearing, the person shall be given an opportunity to present any evidence or argument on his or her own behalf. If a hearing is not requested in a timely manner, the commissioner may take the action proposed without a hearing. If the party whose registration or permit is refused, suspended, or revoked requested and appeared at a hearing, he or she may appeal to the director within 10 days of mailing or personal service of the commissioner’s decision. The following procedure shall apply to the appeal:

(1) The appeal need not be formal, but it shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her authorized agent and shall state the grounds for the appeal. The commissioner’s decision shall be stayed pending the director’s decision, except as provided in subdivision (b). The party whose registration or permit has been refused shall remain unregistered or unpermitted pending the outcome of the appeal.

(2) Any party may, at the time of filing the appeal or within 10 days thereafter, make written application to the director to present new evidence, stating the materiality of the evidence, and the reasons why the evidence was not introduced at the hearing before the commissioner. The evidence may be allowed in the discretion of the director. Thereafter, 10 days shall be given the parties to rebut the evidence and make written application to the director to present oral or written argument. An application to present written argument shall be granted, but the director shall have discretion to grant oral argument or to grant both oral and written argument. If an application to present oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for oral argument shall be given each party at least 10 days before the date set therefor. The time may be shortened by mutual agreement of the parties. If written argument is granted, all parties shall be notified thereof and shall simultaneously file briefs within the time specified by the director.

(3) The director shall decide the appeal upon the evidence received at the hearing before the commissioner, oral or written argument, and new or additional evidence as the director may have admitted.

(4) On an appeal pursuant to this section, the director may sustain, reverse, or modify the decision of the commissioner. A copy of the director’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to each party. This shall not be a limitation on the director’s authority to institute proceedings against any state license or other indicant of permission issued pursuant to this division or pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501).

(5) A review of a decision of the director may be sought by the appellant within 30 days of the date of the decision pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever the commissioner has reason to believe that continuance of a registration or permit specified in subdivision (a) endangers public health or safety or the environment, the commissioner, without prior notice, may immediately suspend the registration or permit. The commissioner shall inform the party registered or the permittee, in writing, of the suspension as soon as practical, specifying the reasons for the immediate suspension. When acting pursuant to this subdivision, the commissioner, within seven days of informing the permittee or registered person of the immediate suspension, shall issue a written notice of proposed action as specified in subdivision (a). Subdivision (a) applies to the notice of proposed action, hearing, and appeal, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision. If a hearing is requested, it shall be held not later than seven days from the date the request for the hearing is received by the commissioner, unless the person requesting the hearing agrees to a later hearing date. The commissioner’s decision shall be issued within 10 days after the conclusion of the hearing. If the party against whom action was taken requested and appeared at a hearing, he or she may appeal the commissioner’s decision, issued following the hearing, to the director as provided in subdivision (a). The director may stay the commissioner’s decision pending the director’s decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 435, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11513.

Any money which is derived under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 11701) of Chapter 4 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 11901) of Chapter 5 shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. Any money in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund which is derived under the provisions of this division may be expended for the administration and enforcement of this division, notwithstanding any other provision of law which limits the expenditure of any such money to the specific purposes or to the administration or enforcement of each of these portions of this code separately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 24.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11514.

Whenever a decision of the director suspends for 30 days or less the license of a person licensed pursuant to Sections 11701 to 11709, inclusive, or Sections 11901 to 11913, inclusive, and such suspension becomes final, the licensee may, before the operative date of such suspension, petition the director for permission to make a monetary payment in lieu of serving all, or a portion, of the suspension. Upon receipt of such petition, the director may stay the suspension while he makes such investigation as he deems desirable and may grant the petition if he is satisfied (a) that the public health, safety and welfare will not be impaired by permitting the licensee to operate during the period set for suspension; (b) the payment of the sum of money will achieve the desired disciplinary purpose; and (c) that it will be possible to determine with reasonable accuracy from the records of the licensee the services which would have been performed under the privilege of the license during the period in which the license would have been suspended.

As to a licensee engaged for hire in the business of pest control, the monetary payment stated in the petition shall be in a specific amount, which is estimated to be the equivalent of 20 percent of the gross receipts of the licensee for each day of the suspension and shall not be less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

As to a licensee licensed with a pest control aircraft pilot’s certificate, the monetary payment in the petition shall be in a specific amount, which is estimated to be the equivalent of 50 percent of the gross earnings of the licensee for all work performed by him under the privileges of the license for each day of the suspension and shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

When the decision provides that a portion of the suspension shall be stayed on probationary conditions, the petition shall not apply to the portion of the suspension which is so stayed, nor shall such portion be included in determining the 30-day limitation for eligibility of the petition.

If the petition is accepted, then upon payment by the licensee of the sum specified the director shall enter his order permanently staying all or a portion of the suspension in accordance with the petition.

All payments received pursuant to this section shall be credited to the Department of Agriculture Fund for use in the administration and enforcement of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 732.   Note: See this section as modified on July 17, 1991, in Governor's Reorganization Plan No. 1 of 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

11517.

Any person whose license or certificate issued pursuant to this division, Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 14090), or Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 14151) of Division 7 is revoked, or whose application for such a license or certificate is denied for reasons other than his or her failure to satisfy examination requirements, is ineligible for a period of three years from the effective date of the decision to deny or revoke the license or certificate to apply or reapply as an individual, a business, or officer, director, administrator, or owner with a 10 percent or greater interest in a business, whichever is applicable, for the same kind of license or certificate or another license or certificate issued by the department if the grounds for the revocation or denial are determined by the department to be directly relevant to the functions, duties, or responsibilities of that other license or certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 609, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11518.

A commissioner accepting payment for pest control registrations or services by credit card or other payment device may impose a charge for costs incurred in connection with that form of payment and shall use his or her best efforts to minimize those costs. The terms “credit card” and “payment device” have the same meaning as defined in Section 6161 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 889, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

11519.

(a) The department shall convene a Department of Pesticide Regulation Environmental Justice Advisory Committee by January 1, 2026.

(b) (1) The advisory committee shall be composed of up to 11 members, and shall include all of the following:

(A) At least two environmental justice leaders who represent rural communities with the most significant exposure to pesticides.

(B) At least one environmental justice leader who represents urban communities with the most significant exposure to pesticides.

(C) At least one representative of Native American, tribal, or indigenous groups.

(D) At least
 one farmworker advocate.

(E) Up to one person with expertise in issues affecting socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers.

(F) Up to
 one agroecologist or biologist with an environmental justice background.

(2) The goal of the composition of the advisory committee membership is to reflect the geographic diversity of California and represent communities in the central coast, central valley, and southern and northern California.

(c) The
 Director of Pesticide Regulation shall appoint the advisory committee members from nominations received from environmental justice organizations, community groups, or other organizations or entities implementing program work that seeks to achieve environmental justice as defined in Section 65040.12 of the Government Code through an open, public process.

(d) The
 advisory committee, in consultation with the department, shall adopt a charter that includes, but is not limited to, the governance structure of the advisory committee, term limits, an application process for new advisory committee
 members, and the process for identifying prioritized recommendations.

(e) (1) The advisory committee shall provide prioritized recommendations to the department on ways to integrate environmental justice considerations into department programs, policies, decisionmaking, and activities, and on how the department can improve its engagement with communities
 with the most significant exposure to pesticides.

(2) The advisory committee shall develop prioritized recommendations within the department’s authority as specified in statute. The prioritized recommendations shall be done through a public process and take public feedback into consideration.

(f) (1) The members of the advisory committee may receive a reasonable per diem allowance as specified in Section 11564.5 of the Government Code, or at
 a higher rate that may be established by the department, for each day’s attendance at a noticed meeting of the advisory committee. 

(2) The members of the advisory committee may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in connection with their official duties.

(g) The advisory committee members and the
 department shall cofacilitate advisory committee meetings. The advisory committee shall hold, at a minimum, two public meetings annually, of which at least one per year shall be held in
 a community with high pesticide use. Members of the advisory committee shall be provided with a remote call-in option. Language access shall be available to advisory committee members and the public.

(h) The advisory
 committee’s recommendations for the department shall be posted, as needed, on the department’s internet
 website.

(i) The department shall post, as needed, on its internet website, an update on its efforts to incorporate the
 recommendations of the advisory committee.

(j) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Advisory committee” means the Department of Pesticide Regulation Environmental Justice Advisory Committee established pursuant to this section.

(2) “Department” means the Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(3) “Socially disadvantaged farmer or rancher” has the same meaning as
 defined in Section 512.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.   (AB 652)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11520.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is important for California to implement sustainable pest management.

(b) In order to achieve the goal described in subdivision (a), it is the intent of the Legislature that the state do all of the following:

(1) Prioritize prevention and strengthen California’s commitment to pest prevention by doing both of the following fundamental actions:
